Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2305
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Prostitution Intervention and Treatment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 536.